California statutes. Public Contract Code
Notwithstanding any other provisions of Sections 81640 to 81654, inclusive, of the Education Code, or of Sections 20651 to 20659, inclusive, of this code, the governing board of any community college district without advertising for bids, and when that board has determined it to be in the best interests of the district, may authorize by contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order, any public corporation or agency, including any county, city, town, or district, to lease data-processing equipment, purchase materials, supplies, equipment, automotive vehicles, tractors, and other personal property for the district in the manner in which the public corporation or agency is authorized by law to make the leases or purchases. Upon receipt of any such personal property, provided the property complies with the
 specifications set forth in the contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order, the community college district may draw a warrant in favor of the public corporation or agency for the amount of the approved invoice, including the reasonable costs to the public corporation or agency for furnishing the services incidental to the lease or purchase of the personal property. Alternatively, if there is an existing contract between a public corporation or agency and a vendor for the lease or purchase of the personal property, a community college district may authorize the lease or purchase of the personal property directly from the vendor by contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order and make payment to the vendor under the same terms that are available to the public corporation or agency under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   (SB 681)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

20653.

Nothing in this code shall preclude the governing board of any community college district from purchasing materials, equipment or supplies through the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 14814 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

20653.5.

Nothing in this code shall preclude the governing board of a community college district from purchasing materials, equipment, supplies, or services under the same terms and conditions as are specified in a contract lawfully awarded by the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 366, Sec. 3.   (AB 653)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20654.

(a) In an emergency when any repairs, alterations, work, or improvement is necessary to any facility of the college, or to permit the continuance of existing college classes, or to avoid danger to life or property, the board may by unanimous vote, with the approval of the county superintendent of schools, do either of the following:

(1) Make a contract in writing or otherwise on behalf of the district for the performance of labor and furnishing of materials or supplies for the purpose without advertising for or inviting bids.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 20655, authorize the use of day labor or force account for the purpose.

(b) Nothing in this section shall eliminate the need for any bonds or security otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20655.

(a) In each community college district, the governing board may make repairs, alterations, additions, or painting, repainting, or decorating upon school buildings, repair or build apparatus or equipment, make improvements on the school grounds, erect new buildings, and perform maintenance as defined in Section 20656 by day labor, or by force account, whenever the total number of hours on the job does not exceed 350 hours. Moreover, in any district whose number of full-time equivalent students is 15,000 or greater, the governing board may, in addition, make repairs to school buildings, grounds, apparatus, or equipment, including painting or repainting, and perform maintenance, as defined in Section 20656, by day labor or by force account whenever the total number of hours on the job does not exceed 750 hours, or when the cost of materials does not exceed twenty-one thousand dollars ($21,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, day labor shall include the use of maintenance personnel employed on a permanent or temporary basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20656.

For purposes of Section 20655, “maintenance” means routine, recurring, and usual work for the preservation, protection and keeping of any publicly owned or publicly operated facility for its intended purposes in a safe and continually usable condition for which it was designed, improved, constructed, altered or repaired. “Facility” means any plant, building, structure, ground facility, utility system, or real property.

This definition of “maintenance” expressly includes, but is not limited to: carpentry, electrical, plumbing, glazing, and other craft work designed consistent with the definition set forth above to preserve the facility in a safe, efficient, and continually usable condition for which it was intended, including repairs, cleaning, and other operations on machinery and other equipment permanently attached to the building or realty as fixtures.

This definition does not include, among other types of work, janitorial or custodial services and protection of the sort provided by guards or other security forces.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this definition does not include painting, repainting, or decorating other than touchup, but instead it is the intent of the Legislature that such activities be controlled directly by the provisions of Section 20655.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

20657.

It shall be unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects any work, project, service, or purchase for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring contracting after competitive bidding.

The district shall maintain job orders or similar records indicating the total cost expended on each project in accordance with the procedures established in the most recent edition of the California Community College Budget and Accounting Manual for a period of not less than three years after completion of the project.

Informal bidding may be used on work, projects, services, or purchases that cost up to the limits set forth in this article. For the purpose of securing informal bids, the board shall publish annually in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such newspaper, then in some newspaper in general circulation in the county, a notice inviting contractors to register to be notified of future informal bidding projects. All contractors included on the informal bidding list shall be given notice of all informal bid projects, in any manner as the district deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20658.

The governing board of any community college district may by majority vote authorize its district superintendent, or such person as he or she may designate, to expend up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per transaction for work done, compensation for employees or consultants, and purchases of equipment, supplies, or materials. Ratification by the governing board shall not be required with respect to transactions entered into pursuant to this section. In the event of malfeasance in office, the district official invested by the governing board with authority to act under this section shall be personally liable for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of such malfeasance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

20659.

If any change or alteration of a contract governed by the provisions of this article is ordered by the governing board of the community college district, such change or alteration shall be specified in writing and the cost agreed upon between the governing board and the contractor. The board may authorize the contractor to proceed with performance of the change or alteration without the formality of securing bids, if the cost so agreed upon does not exceed the greater of:

(a) The amount specified in Section 20651 or 20655, whichever is applicable to the original contract; or

(b) Ten percent of the original contract price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

20660.

Perishable food stuffs and seasonal commodities needed in the operation of cafeterias and food services may be purchased by a community college district in accordance with rules and regulations for the purchase adopted by the governing board of that district, notwithstanding any provisions of this code in conflict with the rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 707.)
-------------------------------------------

20661.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges is authorized to enter into a contract on behalf of one or more community college districts, subject to the following restrictions:

(1) No district may be required to participate in any contract entered into pursuant to this section.

(2) The cost to each district that is a party to or a beneficiary of a contract entered into pursuant to this section must be lower than the cost the district could obtain through its standard contracting procedures. No contract for the procurement of goods or services may be made when a bid has been received by a participating district for the procurement of the same goods or services unless the contract would result in a lower price for the goods or services upon the same terms, conditions, and specifications.

(3) The state shall not incur any financial responsibility in connection with a contract entered into pursuant to this section.

(b) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges is authorized to charge a fee, commission, or other charge to either or both of the following:

(1) Each provider of goods or services under a contract entered into pursuant to this section.

(2) Each community college district that the chancellor enters into a contract on behalf of pursuant to this section.

(c) On or before January 1, 2001, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on contracts entered into pursuant to this section and any resultant cost savings.

(d) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1023, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20662.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may enter into a contract or other agreement with the governing board of any community college district whereby the district performs services or acts as a fiscal agent on behalf of the California Community Colleges, without advertising for or inviting bids for contracts or other agreements that are no more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). For existing contracts or other agreements that the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges has entered into with the governing board of any community college district pursuant to this section, the contract or
 other agreement may be renewed without advertising for or inviting bids, regardless of the amount. This section shall apply only when the funds for the contract or agreement are in satisfaction of the state obligation to provide funding pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 46) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 35.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 36 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

20662.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may enter into a contract or other agreement with the governing board of any community college district whereby the district performs services or acts as a fiscal agent on behalf of the California Community Colleges. This section shall apply only when the funds for the contract or agreement are in satisfaction of the state obligation to provide funding pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 47) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 36.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 41.5. Job Order Contracting for Community College Districts [20665.20. - 20665.33.]

20665.20.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to demonstrate an alternative and optional procedure for bidding of public works projects that is applicable only to community college districts. The Legislature has previously authorized the use of this alternative and optional procedure only for school districts.

(b) Districts should be able to utilize cost-effective options for the delivery of public works projects, in accordance with the national trend, which include authorizations in California, to allow public entities to utilize job order contracts as a project delivery method.

(c) The benefits of a job order contract project delivery system include accelerated completion of the projects, cost savings, and reduction of construction contracting complexity for the district.

(d) The job order contracting approach should be used for the purposes of reducing project cost and expediting project completion.

(e) The availability of job order contracting as a project delivery method will not preclude the use of traditional methods of project delivery if a traditional method results in higher cost savings.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that job order contracts be competitively bid and awarded to the bidders providing the most qualified responsive bids. It is further the intent of the Legislature that districts use the job order
 contract process pursuant to this article only if the district has entered into a project labor agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500 for all its public works projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.21.

As used in this article: 

(a) “Adjustment factor” means the job order contractor’s competitively bid adjustment to the community college district’s prices as published in the unit price catalog.

(b) “Indefinite quantity” means one or more of the construction tasks listed in the unit price catalog.

(c) “Job order” means a firm, fixed priced, lump-sum order issued by the school district to a job order contractor for a definite project scope of work as compiled from the unit price catalog to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

(d) “Job order contract” means a
 contract, awarded to a most qualified bidder as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20665.24, between the community college district and a licensed, bonded, and general liability insured contractor in which the contractor agrees to a fixed period, fixed-unit price, and indefinite quantity contract that provides for the use of job orders for public works or maintenance projects.

(e) “Job order contract technical specifications” means a book, published by the community college district, detailing the technical specifications with regard to quality of materials and workmanship to be used by the job order contractor in accomplishing the tasks listed in the unit price catalog.

(f) “Job order contractor” means a licensed, bonded, and general liability insured contractor awarded a job order contract.

(g) “Offer to perform work” means the job order contractor’s proposal for a specific job order.

(h) “Plans and specifications” means the unit price catalog and the job order contract technical specifications. The scope of work to be performed with a job order contract is potentially, but not necessarily, all the tasks published in the unit price catalog.

(i) “Project” means the specific requirements and work to be accomplished by the job order contractor in connection with an individual job order.

(j) “Project labor agreement” means an agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500.

(k) “Project scope of work” means the document and related drawings, specifications, and writings referenced therein which together set forth the
 specific requirements and work to be accomplished by the job order contractor in connection with an individual job order.

(l) “Proposal” means the job order contractor prepared document quoting those construction tasks listed in the unit price catalog that the job order contractor requires to complete the project scope of work, together with the appropriate quantities of each task. The pricing of each task shall be accomplished by multiplying the construction task unit price by the proposed quantity and the contractor’s competitively bid adjustment factor. The proposal shall also contain a schedule for the completion of a specific project scope of work as requested by the community college district. The proposal may also contain approved drawings, work schedule, permits, or other documentation as the community college district may require for a specific job order. The proposal shall be certified as contract compliant by a reviewer independent
 of the contractor.

(m) “Public works” has the same meaning as in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(n) “Public works project” has the same meaning as “public project,” as defined in Section 22002.

(o) “Subcontractor” means any person, firm, or corporation, other than the employees of the job order contractor, who is bonded and general liability insured and who contracts to furnish labor, or labor and materials, at the worksite or in connection with a job order, whether directly or indirectly on behalf of the job order contractor.

(p) “Community college district” means any community college district.

(q) “Unit price catalog” means a book
 containing specific construction tasks and the unit prices to install or demolish that construction. The listed tasks shall be based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices shall include the cost of materials, labor, and equipment for performing the items of work. The prices shall not include overhead and profit. All unit prices shall be developed using local prevailing wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.22.

Provisions in this article only apply to community college districts that choose to utilize job order contracting. A community college district may utilize job order contracting, when permitted by this article, as an alternative to any contracting procedures that the community college district is otherwise authorized or required by law to use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.23.

(a) A community college district may utilize job order contracting pursuant to this article only if the community college district has entered into a project labor agreement or agreements that will apply to all public works awarded through job order contracting and to all other public works of the community college district that exceed a monetary threshold set by the community college district until January 1, 2027, regardless of what contracting procedure is used to award that work.

(b) A community college district shall prepare an execution plan for all modernization projects that may be eligible for job order contracting pursuant to this article. The community college district shall select from that plan a sufficient number of projects to be initiated as job
 order contracts during each calendar year and shall determine for each selected project that job order contracting will reduce the total cost of that project. Job order contracting shall not be used if the community college district finds that it will increase the total cost of the project.

(c) (1) An entity awarded a job order contract in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall provide an enforceable commitment to the community college district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the job order contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the job order contract is subject to a project labor agreement that
 will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the job order contract to use a skilled and trained workforce to perform the job order contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   (AB 846)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.24.

Bidding for job order contracts shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) A community college district shall prepare a set of documents for job order contracts. The documents shall include a unit price catalog and preestablished unit prices, job order contract technical specifications, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the community college district’s needs.

(2) Any architect, engineer, consultant, or contractor retained by the community college district to assist in the development of the job order contract documents shall not be eligible to bid or to participate in the preparation
 of a bid with any job order contractor.

(b) Based on the documents prepared under subdivision (a), a community college district shall prepare a request for bid that invites prequalified job order contractors to submit competitive sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the community college district.

(1) (A) The prequalified job order contractors, as determined by a community college district, shall bid one or more adjustment factors to the unit prices listed in the unit price catalog based on the job order contract technical specifications. Awards shall be made to the prequalified bidders that the community college district determines to be the most qualified based upon preestablished criteria made by a community college district. The prequalified bidders shall
 be in compliance with a community college district’s project labor agreement.

(B) Compliance shall constitute no more than three major violations on any community college district projects within the last three years. If a contractor has more than three violations within a three-year period of time, the community college district shall seek administrative review of the violations. Violations will include, but are not limited to, the following:

(i) Failure to register core workers with the appropriate building trade union.

(ii) Failure to assign apprentices in accordance with Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(iii) Failure to comply with subdivision (c) of
 Section 20665.25.

(iv) Incorrect assignment of work in accordance with the community college district’s project labor agreement.

(2) The community college district may award multiple job order contracts through a request for bid. Job order contracts shall be awarded to the most qualified prequalified bidders described in this subdivision.

(3) The request for bids may encourage the participation of local construction firms and the use of local subcontractors.

(c) (1) A community college district shall establish a procedure to prequalify job order contractors using a standard questionnaire that includes, at a minimum, the issues covered by the
 standardized questionnaire and model guidelines for rating bidders developed by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20101. This questionnaire shall require information including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) If the job order contractor is a partnership, limited partnership, or other association, a listing of all of the partners or association members known at the time of bid submission who will participate in the job order contract.

(B) Evidence that the members of the job order contractor have the capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage the construction of the project, as well as a financial
 statement that assures the community college district that the job order contractor has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to perform construction, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the job order contractor has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding and liability insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history, worker safety programs, and apprenticeship programs.

(F) A full disclosure regarding all of the following that
 are applicable:

(i) Any serious or willful violation of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the job order contractor.

(ii) Any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project.

(iii) Any instance where the job order contractor, or its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive, or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(iv) Any instance where the job order contractor,
 or its owners, officers, or managing employees defaulted on a construction contract.

(v) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), excluding alleged violations of federal or state law regarding the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or of Federal Insurance Contribution Act (FICA) withholding requirements settled against any member of the job order contractor.

(vi) Any bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the job order contractor, including, but not limited to, information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(vii) Any settled adverse
 claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the job order contractor during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this period.

(G) In the case of a partnership or any association that is not a legal entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association and specifying that all partners or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the job order contract.

(2) The information required under this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the entity and its members in the manner in which
 civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information that is not a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 131.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.25.

(a) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a single job order contract shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the first term of the job order contract and, if extended or renewed pursuant to subdivision (b), a maximum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the job order contract.

(b) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for two 12-month periods. The term of the job order contract shall be for the contract term or whenever the maximum value of the contract is achieved, whichever is less. All extensions or renewals shall be priced as provided in the request for
 bids. The extension or renewal shall be mutually agreed to by the community college district and the job order contractor.

(c) The community college district may issue job orders to the job order contractor that has been awarded the job order contract. The job order issued to the job order contractor shall not commence for seven days from the time the job order was issued and the job order contractor shall provide a minimum of seven days’ notice for the addition of any subcontractor or substitution of any subcontractor as described in subdivision (e) of Section 20665.26. The job order shall be based on a project scope of work prepared by the community college district as well as a proposal from the job order contractor who is awarded the job order contract. No single job order may exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(d) The amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (c) shall
 be adjusted on January 1, 2018, as if this section was operative beginning January 1, 2004, to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, and shall be adjusted each January 1 thereafter to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(e) It is unlawful to split or separate into smaller job orders any project for the purpose of evading the cost limitation provisions of this article.

(f) All work performed under the job order contract shall be covered by a project labor agreement.

(g) Any change or alteration to a job order shall be in compliance with Section 20118.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.26.

(a) All work bid under the job order contract shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 and is subject to all of the penalties and provisions set forth in that chapter.

(b) For purposes of this article, if the primary job order contractor chooses to use subcontractors, the primary job order contractor is required to verify that the subcontractors possess the appropriate licenses and credentials required to perform construction.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the primary job order contractor may use subcontractors that are not listed at the time the job order is issued if the work to be performed under that job order is less than ten thousand
 dollars ($10,000).

(d) If the primary job order contractor chooses to use a subcontractor that is not listed at the time of bid to perform work on a job order, all of the following apply:

(1) The primary job order contractor shall provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted by trade. The public notice shall include the scope of work; the project location; the name, address, and the telephone number of the primary job order contractor; and the closing date, time, and location for sealed bids to be submitted.

(2) The primary job order contractor shall take sealed bids from the subcontractors solicited for the proposal. These bids shall be publicly opened at a prescribed time and place by the primary job order contractor. After the bids are opened, the job order contractor shall notify the
 community college district which subcontractor was selected.

(3) The notification shall include every subcontractor for all tiers and shall establish the authorized subcontractor list for the job order. Work shall not commence prior to seven days’ notice of the established subcontractor list and the subsequent addition of any subcontractor to the job order.

(4) The notification shall identify the scope of the work to be performed by each subcontractor to the job order, broken down by craft. If a subcontractor performs multiple crafts, the job order contractor shall identify the work of each craft to be performed.

(e) If the primary job order contractor chooses to make a substitution to the subcontractor list, the primary job order contractor shall provide a minimum of seven days’ notice to the community college
 district along with justification as to the need for the substitution. The community college district may request a hearing to evaluate the substitution request, which shall be in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(f) If the community college district determines that there has been a violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1, including bid shopping by the primary job order contractor, the community college district may terminate the job order or the contractor may lose authorization to proceed with awarded work subject to the community college district’s administrative due process review, if that review is established pursuant to the community college district’s project labor agreement. If the community college district determines that a job order contractor has violated any provision set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1, the community college district may
 declare the contractor ineligible for future job orders and may result in a loss of prequalification status for a period of time to be determined by the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.27.

(a) A job order contract shall set forth in the general conditions of the job order contract the party or parties responsible for seeing that the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code are complied with.

(b) For purposes of job order contracting, prevailing wages when required to be paid shall apply to all work ordered under the job order contract regardless of thresholds set forth in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code.

(c) The job order contractor shall pay the prevailing wage in effect at the time the job order is issued by the community college district and all increases as published by the Department of
 Industrial Relations for the term of the job order contract, including all overtime, holiday, and shift provisions published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(d) The community college district shall designate one individual to act as a monitor to inspect job sites for labor compliance violations at the request of the designated labor representative in its project labor agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.28.

A willful violation of Section 20665.26 occurs when the job order contractor or subcontractor knew or reasonably should have known of his or her obligations under the public works law and deliberately fails or refuses to comply with its provisions. The community college district using job order contracting shall publish and distribute to the Labor Commissioner a list of all job order contractors or subcontractors who violate this provision and the community college district shall not award a job order contract or any future job orders under an existing job order contract to any contractor or subcontractor who violates this provision during the effective period of debarment of the contractor or subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.29.

For purposes of employment of apprentices on job order contracts, when the individual job order involves more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or 20 working days, all general contractors or subcontractors shall at all times be in compliance with Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code and shall comply with the following:

(a) Prior to commencing work on an individual job order, every contractor shall submit job order award information to an applicable apprenticeship program that can supply apprentices to the site of the job order. The information submitted shall include an estimate of the journeyman hours to be performed under the contract, the number of apprenticeships proposed to be employed, and the approximate dates the apprentices would be employed. A copy of
 this information shall also be submitted to the awarding agency if requested by the awarding agency.

(b) The ratio of work performed by apprentices to journeymen employed in a particular craft or trade on the job order may be no higher than the ratio stipulated in the apprenticeship standard under which the apprenticeship program operates where the job order contractor agrees to be bound by those standards but, except as otherwise provided in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code, in no case shall the ratio be less than one hour of apprenticeship work for every five hours of journeyman work.

(c) Every apprentice employed under the job order contract shall be paid the prevailing rate of per diem wages for apprentices in the trade to which he or she is registered and shall be employed only at the work of the craft or trade to which he or she is registered.

(d) Every apprentice employed under the job order contract shall be hired from the local joint labor management apprenticeship committee that has jurisdiction in the geographic area of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20665.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.30.
